ja: ブロッキングマットの表面マーキング: 角度 / 度数ガイド; ボーダー定規 / スケール; センチメートルグリッド; 同心円; カスタム / その他; インチグリッド; マーキングなし; 長方形グリッド; 正方形グリッド; その他
ko: 블로킹 매트 표면 표시: 각도/도 가이드; 테두리 눈금자/비율; 센티미터 그리드; 동심원; 사용자 지정/기타; 인치 그리드; 표시 없음; 직사각형 그리드; 정사각형 그리드; 기타
sv: Blockeringsmatta med ytmarkeringar: Vinkel-/gradmarkeringar; Kantlinjaler/-skalor; Centimeterrutnät; Koncentriska cirklar; Anpassat/övrigt; Tumrutnät; Inga markeringar; Rektangulärt rutnät; Kvadratiskt rutnät; Övrigt
zh-TW: 阻擋墊表面標記: 角度/度數指南; 邊緣尺規/刻度; 公分網格; 同心圓; 自訂/其他; 英吋網格; 無標記; 長方形網格; 正方形網格; 其他
nb: Blokkerende markeringer på matteoverflaten: Vinkel-/gradguider; Kantlinjaler/skalaer; Centimeterrutenett; Konsentriske sirkler; Egendefinert/annet; Tommerutenett; Ingen markeringer; Rektangulært rutenett; Kvadratisk rutenett; Annet
es: Marcas de superficie de la alfombrilla de bloqueo: Guías de ángulos/grados; Reglas/escalas en los bordes; Cuadrícula en centímetros; Círculos concéntricos; Personalizado/otro; Cuadrícula en pulgadas; Sin marcas; Cuadrícula rectangular; Cuadrícula cuadrada; Otro
th: เครื่องหมายบนพื้นผิวแผ่นบล็อกงาน: ไกด์องศา/มุม; ไม้บรรทัด/สเกลที่ขอบ; กริดเซนติเมตร; วงกลมซ้อนทับกัน; กำหนดเอง/อื่นๆ; กริดนิ้ว; ไม่มีเครื่องหมาย; กริดสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; กริดสี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Označevanje površine blokirne podloge: Kotna/stopinjska vodila; Obrobna ravnila/merila; Centimetrska mreža; Koncentrični krogi; Po meri/drugo; Palčna mreža; Brez oznak; Pravokotna mreža; Kvadratna mreža; Drugo
nl: Blok mat oppervlakte markeringen: Hoek-/gradenlijnen; Randlinialen/-schalen; Centimeterraster; Concentrische cirkels; Aangepast/anders; Inchraster; Geen markeringen; Rechthoekig raster; Vierkant raster; Anders
ru: Разметка поверхности блокировочного коврика: Угловые направляющие; Линейки/шкалы по краям; Сантиметровая сетка; Концентрические круги; Пользовательские / Другое; Дюймовая сетка; Без разметки; Прямоугольная сетка; Квадратная сетка; Другое
de: Oberflächenmarkierungen der Blocking-Matte: Winkel-/Gradlinien; Lineale/Skalen am Rand; Zentimeterraster; Konzentrische Kreise; Benutzerdefiniert/Sonstige; Zollraster; Ohne Markierungen; Rechteckiges Raster; Quadratisches Raster; Sonstige
tr: Bloklama matı yüzey işaretleri: Açı/derece kılavuzları; Kenar cetvelleri/ölçekleri; Santimetre ızgara; Eş merkezli daireler; Özel/diğer; İnç ızgara; İşaretsiz; Dikdörtgen ızgara; Kare ızgara; Diğer
hr-HR: Oznake površine blokirajuće podloge: Vodiči za kutove/stupnjeve; Rubna ravnala/ljestvice; Mreža u centimetrima; Koncentrični krugovi; Prilagođeno/ostalo; Mreža u inčima; Bez oznaka; Pravokutna mreža; Kvadratna mreža; Ostalo
en: Blocking mat surface markings: Angle/degree guides; Border rulers/scales; Centimeter grid; Concentric circles; Custom/other; Inch grid; No markings; Rectangular grid; Square grid; Other
fr: Repères de surface du tapis de blocage: Guides d’angle/de degré; Règles/échelles de bordure; Grille en centimètres; Cercles concentriques; Personnalisée/autre; Grille en pouces; Sans marquage; Grille rectangulaire; Grille carrée; Autre
hu: Blokkoló szőnyeg felületi jelölései: Szög-/fokvezetők; Szegélyvonalzók / skálák; Centiméteres rács; Koncentrikus körök; Egyedi / egyéb; Hüvelykes rács; Jelölések nélkül; Négyszögletes rács; Négyzethálós rács; Egyéb
el: Σημάνσεις επιφάνειας βάσης μπλοκαρίσματος: Οδηγοί γωνίας/μοιρών; Χάρακες/κλίμακες περιθωρίου; Πλέγμα εκατοστών; Ομόκεντροι κύκλοι; Προσαρμοσμένο/Άλλο; Πλέγμα ιντσών; Χωρίς σημάδια; Ορθογώνιο πλέγμα; Τετράγωνο πλέγμα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Marcações na superfície do tapete de bloqueio: Guias de ângulo/grau; Réguas/escalas de borda; Grade em centímetros; Círculos concêntricos; Personalizado/outro; Grade em polegadas; Sem marcações; Grade retangular; Grade quadrada; Outro
zh-CN: 定型垫表面标记: 角度/度数参考线; 边框直尺/刻度; 厘米网格; 同心圆; 自定义/其他; 英寸网格; 无标记; 矩形网格; 正方形网格; 其他
lt-LT: Blokavimo kilimėlio paviršiaus žymėjimai: Kampų / laipsnių žymos; Kraštinės liniuotės / skalės; Centimetrų tinklelis; Koncentriniai apskritimai; Pasirinktinės / kita; Colių tinklelis; Be žymų; Stačiakampis tinklelis; Kvadratinis tinklelis; Kita
pt-PT: Marcações na superfície do tapete de bloqueio: Guias de ângulo/graus; Réguas/escalas de margem; Grelha em centímetros; Círculos concêntricos; Personalizadas/outras; Grelha em polegadas; Sem marcações; Grelha retangular; Grelha quadrada; Outras
vi: Các dấu hiệu trên bề mặt thảm định hình: Hướng dẫn góc/độ; Thước viền/thang đo; Lưới centimet; Các vòng tròn đồng tâm; Tùy chỉnh/khác; Lưới inch; Không có vạch chia; Lưới chữ nhật; Lưới vuông; Khác
ro-RO: Marcaje de suprafață pentru covorașul pentru întindere: Ghidaje unghi/grade; Rigle/scale de margine; Grilă în centimetri; Cercuri concentrice; Personalizat/altele; Grilă în inchi; Fără marcaje; Grilă dreptunghiulară; Grilă pătrată; Altele
sk-SK: Značenie povrchu blokovacej rohože: Značky uhlov/stupňov; Okrajové pravítka/mierky; Centimetrová mriežka; Sústredné kruhy; Vlastné/iné; Palcová mriežka; Bez značiek; Obdĺžniková mriežka; Štvorcová mriežka; Iné
fi: Pingotusalustan pintamerkinnät: Kulma-/asteohjaimet; Reunaviivaimet/-asteikot; Senttimetriruudukko; Samankeskiset ympyrät; Mukautettu/muu; Tuumaruudukko; Ei merkintöjä; Suorakulmainen ruudukko; Neliöruudukko; Muu
bg-BG: Маркировки върху повърхността на блокиращата постелка: Водачи за ъгли/градуси; Линийки/скали по краищата; Сантиметрова мрежа; Концентрични кръгове; Персонализирани/други; Инчова мрежа; Без маркировки; Правоъгълна мрежа; Квадратна мрежа; Други
cs: Značení na povrchu blokovací podložky: Úhlové vodítko / stupně; Okrajová pravítka / měřítka; Centimetrová mřížka; Soustředné kruhy; Vlastní / jiné; Palcová mřížka; Bez značení; Obdélníková mřížka; Čtvercová mřížka; Jiné
pl: Oznaczenia powierzchni maty blokującej: Prowadnice kątowe/stopniowe; Miarki/skale brzegowe; Siatka centymetrowa; Okręgi współśrodkowe; Niestandardowe / inne; Siatka calowa; Brak oznaczeń; Siatka prostokątna; Siatka kwadratowa; Inne
it: Marcature di superficie del tappetino di bloccaggio: Guide per angoli/gradi; Righelli/scale sui bordi; Griglia in centimetri; Cerchi concentrici; Personalizzate/altro; Griglia in pollici; Nessuna marcatura; Griglia rettangolare; Griglia quadrata; Altro
da: Overmaling af markeringer på blokmåtter: Vinkel-/gradmål; Kantlinealer/-skalaer; Centimetergitter; Koncentriske cirkler; Brugerdefineret/andet; Tommegitter; Ingen markeringer; Rektangulært gitter; Firkantet gitter; Andet